tests/runtime/hop.sbl
// Test `hop` and `next`.

externals (stem)

strings (s)

define stem as (
  next or fail='next failed'
  not (hop len-3) or fail='hop by calculated negative signalled t'
  test (tolimit not next or fail='next at end of string signalled t')
  not (hop len-cursor+1) or fail='hop past end of string signalled t'
)
